California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------

18878.

Any person who otherwise violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Boxer Benefits [18880. - 18887.]

18880.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) That professional athletes licensed under this chapter, as a group, for many reasons, do not retain their earnings, and are often injured or destitute, or both, and unable to take proper care of themselves, whether financially or otherwise, and that the enactment of this article is to serve a public purpose by making provisions for a needy group to insure a modicum of financial security for professional athletes.

(2) Athletes licensed under this chapter may suffer extraordinary disabilities in the normal course of their trade. These may include acute and chronic traumatic brain injuries, resulting from multiple concussions as well as from repeated exposure to a large number of subconcussive punches, eye injuries, including retinal tears, holes, and detachments, and other neurological impairments.

(3) The pension plan of the commission is part of the state’s health and safety regulatory scheme, designed to protect boxers licensed under this chapter from the health-related hazards of their trade. The pension plan addresses those health and safety needs, recognizing the disability and health maintenance expenses those needs may require.

(4) The regulatory system of California is interrelated with the conduct of the trade in every jurisdiction. Athletes licensed under this chapter participate in contests in other states and many athletes who are based in those other jurisdictions may participate in California on a single-event basis.

(5) The outcomes and natures of fights in other jurisdictions are relevant to California regulatory jurisdiction and are routinely monitored for health and safety reasons, so that, for example, a knockout of an athlete licensed under this chapter in another jurisdiction is paid appropriate heed with respect to establishing a waiting period before that athlete may commence fighting in California.

(6) The monitoring of other jurisdictions is an integral part of the health and safety of California athletes licensed under this chapter due to the interstate nature of the trade, and therefore the regulatory scheme for contests and athletes under this chapter should reflect this accordingly.

(b) The provisions of this article pertain only to professional boxers licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 465, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18881.

(a) The commission shall, consistent with the purposes of this article, establish a pension plan for professional boxers who engage in boxing contests in this state.

(b) (1) The commission shall, consistent with the purposes of this article, establish the method by which the pension plan will be financed, including those who shall contribute to the financing of the pension plan.

(2) The method of financing the pension plan shall include an assessment in the amount of one dollar ($1) on each ticket sold for a professional boxing contest held in the state, up to a maximum contribution of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per contest.

(3) The method for financing the pension plan may include a contribution by boxers, managers, promoters, or any one or more of these persons, in an amount sufficient to finance the pension plan.

(c) Any pension plan established by the commission shall be actuarially sound.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 486, Sec. 8.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18882.

(a) At the time of payment of the fee required by Section 18824, a promoter shall pay to the commission all amounts scheduled for contribution to the pension plan. If the commission, in its discretion, requires pursuant to Section 18881, that contributions to the pension plan be made by the boxer and his or her manager, those contributions shall be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(b) All contributions to finance the pension plan shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the Boxers’ Pension Fund, which is hereby created. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys
 in the Boxers’ Pension Fund are hereby continuously appropriated to be used
 exclusively for the purposes and administration of the pension plan.

(c) The Boxers’ Pension Fund is a retirement fund, and no moneys within it shall be deposited or transferred to the General Fund.

(d) The commission has exclusive control of all funds in the Boxers’ Pension Fund. No transfer or disbursement in any amount from this fund shall be made except upon the authorization of the commission and for the purpose and administration of the pension plan.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the commission or its designee shall invest the money contained in the Boxers’ Pension Fund according to the same standard of care as provided in Section 16040 of the Probate Code. The commission has
 exclusive control over the investment of all moneys in the Boxers’ Pension Fund. Except as otherwise prohibited or restricted by law, the commission may invest the moneys in the fund through the purchase, holding, or sale of any investment, financial instrument, or financial transaction that the commission in its informed opinion determines is prudent.

(f) The administrative costs associated with investing, managing, and distributing the Boxers’ Pension Fund shall be limited to no more than 2 percent of the corpus of the fund. Diligence shall be exercised by administrators in order to lower the fund’s expense ratio as far below 2 percent as feasible and appropriate. The commission shall report to the Legislature on the impact of this provision during the next regularly scheduled sunset review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 370, Sec. 19.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

18884.

(a) A promoter may, but is not required to, add to the price of each ticket sold for a professional boxing contest, an amount specifically designated on the ticket for contribution as a donation, either or both, to the pension plan established pursuant to Section 18881. The additional amount shall not be subject to the admissions tax required by Section 18824 or any other deductions. Nothing in this section shall authorize the addition of such amounts to less than all the tickets sold for the professional boxing contest involved. The promoter shall pay additional contributions collected in accordance with Section 18881.

(b) Any additional contributions received pursuant to this section shall not be considered to offset any of the contributions required by the commission under Section 18881.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18887.

In addition to any other form in which retirement benefits may be distributed under the pension plan, the commission may, in its discretion, award to a covered boxer a medical early retirement benefit in the amount contained in the covered boxers’ pension plan account at the time the commission makes this award and in the manner provided in the regulations governing the boxers’ pension plan. This benefit shall be in lieu of a pension.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 377, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Mixed Martial Arts Retirement Benefit Fund [18888. - 18888.12.]

18888.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Many Californians find a need, purpose, and great benefit in participating in combat sports.

(b) That professional athletes licensed under this chapter, as a group, for many reasons, do not retain their earnings, and are often injured or destitute, or both, and unable to take proper care of themselves, whether financially or otherwise, and that the enactment of this article is to serve a public purpose by making provisions for a needy group to insure a modicum of financial security for professional athletes.

(c) Athletes licensed under this chapter may suffer extraordinary
 disabilities in the normal course of their trade. These may include acute and chronic traumatic brain injuries, resulting from multiple concussions as well as from repeated exposure to a large number of subconcussive punches and kicks, eye injuries, including retinal tears, holes, and detachments, and other neurological impairments.

(d) The retirement benefit plan of the commission is part of the state’s health and safety regulatory scheme, designed to protect professional athletes, including mixed martial artists, licensed under this chapter from the health-related hazards of their trade. The retirement benefit plan addresses those health and safety needs, recognizing the disability and health maintenance expenses those needs may require.

(e) The regulatory system of California is interrelated with the conduct of the trade in every jurisdiction. Athletes licensed under this
 chapter participate in contests in other states and many athletes who are based in those other jurisdictions may participate in California on a single-event basis.

(f) The outcomes and natures of fights in other jurisdictions are relevant to California regulatory jurisdiction and are routinely monitored for health and safety reasons, so that, for example, a knockout of an athlete licensed under this chapter in another jurisdiction is paid appropriate heed with respect to establishing a waiting period before that athlete may commence fighting in California.

(g) The monitoring of other jurisdictions is an integral part of the health and safety of California athletes licensed under this chapter due to the interstate nature of the trade, and therefore the regulatory scheme for contests and athletes under this chapter should reflect this
 accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.1.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Beneficiary” means a person entitled under this article to receive benefits after the death of a participating martial artist.

(b) “Martial artist” means a licensed professional mixed martial artist, licensed professional kickboxer, licensed professional Muay Thai fighter, or athlete licensed by the commission other than a boxer.

(c) “Mixed martial arts contest” shall mean a professional martial arts contest approved by the commission, including kickboxing and Muay Thai, other than boxing.

(d) “MMA Fund” means the Mixed Martial Arts
 Retirement Benefit Fund created pursuant to Section 18888.2.

(e) “Participating martial artist” means a martial artist who participates in a commission-sanctioned contest in the state on or after January 1, 2024, and who is, or may become, eligible to receive a benefit under this article or whose beneficiary may be eligible to receive that benefit.

(f) “Regular account” means the account maintained by the commission, or its designee, on the records of the MMA Fund for each participating martial artist representing allocations of contributions, adjusted for withdrawals, income, expenses, and released and unrealized gains and losses attributable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.2.

(a) The commission shall, consistent with the purposes of this article, establish the Mixed Martial Arts Retirement Benefit Fund for martial artists who engage in mixed martial arts contests in this state.

(b) (1) The commission shall, consistent with the purposes of this article, establish the method by which the MMA Fund will be financed, including those who shall contribute to the financing of the MMA Fund.

(2) The method of financing the MMA Fund shall include any of the following:

(A) (i) An assessment in the amount of one dollar ($1) on each ticket sold for a
 professional mixed martial arts contest held in the state.

(ii) The commission may raise, by regulation, the assessment authorized by this subparagraph to an amount not greater than two dollars ($2) per ticket.

(B) Revenue through the sale of special interest license plates and other commission-branded items, including, but not limited to, sport paraphernalia and souvenirs.

(C) Contributions by martial artists, managers, promoters, or any one or more of these persons, in an amount sufficient to finance the MMA Fund.

(c) The MMA Fund shall be actuarially sound.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.3.

(a) At the time of payment of the fee required by Section 18824, a promoter shall pay to the commission all amounts scheduled for contribution to the MMA Fund. If the commission, in its discretion, requires, pursuant to Section 18888.2, that contributions to the MMA Fund be made by the martial artist and the martial artist’s manager, those contributions shall be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(b) All contributions to finance the MMA Fund shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the Mixed Martial Arts Retirement Benefit Fund, which is hereby created. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the MMA Fund are continuously appropriated to be used exclusively for the
 purposes and administration of the MMA Fund.

(c) Contributions to finance the MMA Fund shall be allocated to each participating martial artist’s regular account on the last day of the MMA Fund year pursuant to both of the following requirements:

(1) Fifty percent of the contributions for the MMA Fund year shall be allocated among the regular accounts of participating martial artists as of the last day of the MMA Fund year in the proportion that each martial artist’s scheduled rounds fought for the MMA Fund year bears to the total scheduled rounds fought in the MMA Fund year.

(2) Fifty percent of the contributions for the MMA Fund year shall be allocated among the regular accounts of participating martial artists as of the last day of the MMA Fund year in the proportion that each martial artist’s total purses for the
 MMA Fund years bears to the total purses for all fights fought by participating martial artists in the MMA Fund year.

(d) If a participating martial artist fails to become vested in the amount credited to the participating martial artist’s regular account before the participating martial artist’s death, the regular account shall be forfeited and reallocated to each participating martial artist’s regular account on the last day of the MMA Fund year pursuant to both of the following:

(1) Fifty percent of the allocable forfeiture account shall be allocated among all regular accounts as of the last day of the MMA Fund year in the proportion that each regular account bears to the total regular accounts.

(2) Fifty percent of the allocable forfeiture account shall be added to the contributions for the MMA Fund year and
 shall be allocated among the regular accounts of participating martial artists who have fought in the current MMA Fund year according to the formula prescribed in subdivision (c).

(e) The MMA Fund is a retirement fund, and moneys within it shall not be deposited or transferred to the General Fund.

(f) The commission has exclusive control of all funds in the MMA Fund. A transfer or disbursement in any amount from the MMA Fund shall not be made except upon the authorization of the commission and for the purpose and administration of the MMA Fund.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the commission or its designee shall invest the money contained in the MMA Fund according to the same standard of care as provided in Section 16040 of the Probate Code. The commission has exclusive control over the
 investment of all moneys in the MMA Fund. Except as otherwise prohibited or restricted by law, the commission may invest the moneys in the MMA Fund through the purchase, holding, or sale of any investment, financial instrument, or financial transaction that the commission in its informed opinion determines is prudent.

(h) The administrative costs associated with investing, managing, and distributing the MMA Fund shall be limited to no more than 2 percent of the corpus of the MMA Fund. Diligence shall be exercised by administrators in order to lower the MMA Fund’s expense ratio as far below 2 percent as feasible and appropriate. The commission shall report to the Legislature on the impact of this provision during the next regularly scheduled sunset review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.4.

(a) A promoter may, but is not required to, add to the price of each ticket sold for a professional mixed martial arts contest an amount specifically designated on the ticket for contribution or as a donation, either or both, to the MMA Fund. The additional amount shall not be subject to the admissions tax required by Section 18824 or any other deductions. This subdivision does not authorize the addition of those amounts to less than all the tickets sold for the professional mixed martial arts contest involved. The promoter shall pay additional contributions collected in accordance with Section 18888.2.

(b) Any additional contributions received pursuant to this section shall not be considered to offset any of the contributions required by the
 commission under Section 18888.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.5.

(a) After the participating martial artist has vested in the MMA Fund, the participating martial artist shall not be entitled to distribution of the funds held in the participating martial artist’s regular account until the participating martial artist is at least 50 years of age.

 (b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may, in its discretion, award to a participating martial artist, who has vested in the MMA Fund but is younger than 50 years old, an early retirement benefit for vocational, education, training, or medical need in the amount contained in the participating martial artist’s regular account at the time the commission makes this award and in the manner provided in the regulations governing
 the MMA Fund.

(2) Upon distribution of the early retirement benefit authorized by paragraph (1) to the participating martial artist, the participating martial artist’s regular account shall be closed, and the participating martial artist shall not receive, or otherwise be eligible for, any further contributions to the regular account or retirement benefits from the MMA Fund.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, information submitted by or to a participating martial artist pursuant to this subdivision shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure unless any of the following applies:

(A) The martial artist, in writing, waives the confidentiality of information submitted to the commission.

(B) The information is disclosed pursuant to a lawfully
 issued subpoena.

(C) The information is disclosed pursuant to a written request from a government agency responsible for the enforcement of civil or criminal laws or the professional licensing of individuals that is conducting an investigation about the person who submitted the information to the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.6.

(a) At the time of initial licensure pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18640), the commission shall notify the licensee of the licensee’s enrollment in the MMA Fund.

(b) A participating martial artist shall become vested in the amount credited to the participating martial artist’s regular account when the participating martial artist has fought in at least 39 scheduled rounds in a commission-sanctioned professional mixed martial arts contest held in the state.

(c) (1) The commission shall determine the eligibility of a martial artist to receive benefits from the MMA Fund based upon information gathered for the commission by the commission
 staff.

(2) A determination made pursuant to this subdivision shall be conclusive and binding on all persons.

(3) A misrepresentation by a martial artist, manager, promoter, or beneficiary shall be grounds for the denial, suspension, or discontinuance of benefits, in whole or in part, or for the cancellation or recovery of benefit payments made due to the commission’s reliance on the misrepresentation.

(d) The commission, or its designee, shall notify any participating martial artist of all of the following when the right to receive benefits from the MMA Fund vests in that martial artist:

(1) The date upon which the right to receive the benefits from the MMA Fund vests in the participating martial artist and the dollar amount of the benefits that have
 accrued as of that date.

(2) The date upon which the participating martial artist will first be able to receive benefits from the MMA Fund or will first be able to convert all, or a portion of, those benefits to an early medical or early vocational retirement benefit.

(3) The procedure by which the participating martial artist will be able to claim benefits from the MMA Fund.

(4) The procedure by which the participating martial artist will be annually notified of the value of the accrued benefits beginning after the date upon which the right to receive the benefits from the MMA Fund vests in the martial artist.

(5) The ability of the participating martial artist to designate, pursuant to subdivision (e), one or more beneficiaries of the martial artist’s
 benefits from the MMA Fund upon the death of the martial artist.

(e) (1) (A) A participating martial artist may designate one or more beneficiaries of the martial artist’s benefits from the MMA Fund upon the death of the participating martial artist.

(B) A married participating martial artist and that person’s spouse shall both designate any nonspouse beneficiary or beneficiaries.

(2) A beneficiary designation made pursuant to this subdivision shall be made in writing on a form provided by the commission, or its designee, and shall include the beneficiary’s name, date of birth, address, telephone number, and relationship to the martial artist.

(3) A participating martial artist shall be responsible for
 updating the martial artist’s and beneficiary’s personal information before distribution of a retirement benefit pursuant to this article.

(f) If a participating martial artist fails to become vested in the amount credited to the participating martial artist’s regular account before the participating martial artist’s death, the regular account shall be forfeited and reallocated in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 18888.3.

(g) (1) (A) Except as otherwise specifically permitted by law, the assets and benefits of the MMA Fund shall not be subject to anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, or charge.

(B) An anticipation, alienation, sale, transfer, assignment, pledge, encumbrance, or charge made in violation of this paragraph shall
 be null and void.

 (2) The assets and benefits of the MMA Fund shall not be subject to the debts, contracts, liabilities, or torts of the person entitled to those benefits.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in paragraph (2), a form submitted by a participating martial artist to the commission or its designee pursuant to this section, including a beneficiary designation, shall be confidential and not subject to public disclosure unless the martial artist, in writing, waives the confidentiality.

(2) A form described by paragraph (1), or information contained therein, may be disclosed in response to any of the following:

(A) A lawfully issued subpoena.

(B) A written request from a government agency responsible for the enforcement of civil or criminal laws or the professional licensing of individuals that is conducting an investigation about the person who submitted the form to the commission.

(C) A request for information made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code from an individual whose personal information is provided in the form.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.7.

(a) (1) The commission may, in its discretion, hold a hearing, or assign the matter to an administrative law judge for a hearing, for the purpose of determining a question presented to it involving a right, benefit, or obligation of a person under this article.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to an eligibility determination made pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 18888.6.

(b) If a hearing is held pursuant to this section, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that Section 11508 of the Government Code shall not apply, and the
 hearing shall be held at the time and place determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.8.

A claim by a participating martial artist against the commission arising from the administration of the MMA Fund shall be brought in the County of Sacramento and shall be subject to the Government Claims Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 810) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.9.

The commission may adopt regulations to implement, interpret, or make specific this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.10.

(a) The administration of the MMA Fund shall be contingent upon the availability of funds collected pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 18888.2, which do not divert or detract from funds currently utilized to fund existing functions of the commission.

 (b) In the absence of funding adequate to meet the requirements of this article, this article does not impose any obligations upon the department, the commission, or the MMA Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.11.

This article shall not be construed to create a liability on the General Fund, and the General Fund shall not be used to offset or fund any liabilities attributed to the operation of the MMA Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18888.12.

Moneys collected pursuant to this article shall not be used to fund boxer benefits under Article 16 (commencing with Section 18880).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.3. Online Child Care Job Posting Services [18890. - 18890.6.]

18890.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Online child care job posting service” means any person or business that provides or offers to provide child care providers.

(b) “Background check service provider” means any person or business that provides or offers to provide background check services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 497, Sec. 1.   (AB 2036)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18890.2.

(a) (1) An online child care job posting service that provides online information about potential child care providers who are not required to be licensed in California shall include the following statement on its Internet Web site in California, which shall
 be accessible no more than one click away from the providers’ profile:
“Trustline is California’s official background check for license-exempt child care providers (i.e. babysitters and nannies) and the only authorized screening program in California with access to fingerprint records at the California Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and access to the California Child Abuse Central Index. The Trustline registry toll-free telephone number is 1–800–822–8490.”
(2) An online child care job posting service that provides online information in California about potential child care providers who are required to be licensed in California shall include the following statement
 on its Internet Web site in California, which shall be accessible no more than one click away from the providers’ profile:
“Pursuant to Section 1596.859 of the Health and Safety Code, parents have the right to receive information regarding any substantiated or inconclusive complaint about licensed child care providers. That information is public and can be acquired by visiting the California Department of Social Services’ Internet Web site at “www.ccld.ca.gov.””
(b) If the online child care job posting service provides access to a background
 check for the child care providers listed on its Internet Web site in California,
 it shall provide, by means of a one-click link on each California child care provider profile for which background checks are offered, the written description of the background check provided to it, as described in subdivision (c).

(c) Background check service providers that provide
 background checks
 for online child care job posting services in California shall provide to the online child care job posting services a written description of the background checks conducted that includes at a minimum:

(1) A detailed description of what is included in the background check.

(2) A chart that lists each county in California and the databases that are checked for each county, including the following information for each database, as applicable:

(A) The source of the data, the name of the database used, and a brief description of the data included in the database.

(B) The date range of the oldest data and the most recent data included.

(C) How often the information is updated.

(D) How the databases are checked (by name, social security number, fingerprints, etc.).

(E) A list of the counties for which no data is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 497, Sec. 1.   (AB 2036)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18890.4.

(a) An online child care job posting service or background check service provider that fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter may be liable for a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense. The Attorney General, a city attorney, or a county counsel may bring an action to impose a civil penalty pursuant to this section after doing both of the following:

(1) Providing the online job posting service or background check service provider with reasonable notice of noncompliance. The notice shall inform the online job posting service or background check service provider that it will be subject to a civil penalty if it does not correct the violation within 30 days from the date the notice is sent to the online
 job posting service or background check service provider.

(2) Verifying that the violation was not corrected within the 30-day period described in paragraph (1).

(b) The civil penalty shall be deposited into the General Fund if the action is brought by the Attorney General. If the action is brought by a city attorney, the civil penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a county counsel, the civil penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 497, Sec. 1.   (AB 2036)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18890.6.

(a) In addition to the authority granted to the Attorney General, a city attorney, or a county counsel in Section 18890.4, an individual damaged by a willful violation of the provisions of this chapter may bring a civil cause of action against an online child care job posting service or background check service provider for damages, including, but not limited to, general damages, special damages, and punitive damages.

(b) The court in an action pursuant to this section may award equitable
 relief, including, but not limited to, an injunction, costs, and any other relief the court deems proper.

(c) The rights and remedies provided in this chapter are in addition to any other rights and remedies provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 497, Sec. 1.   (AB 2036)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Athlete Agents [18895. - 18897.97.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [18895. - 18895.2.]

18895.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Miller-Ayala Athlete Agents Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 857, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18895.2.

The following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Agent contract” means any contract or agreement pursuant to which a person authorizes or empowers an athlete agent to negotiate or solicit on behalf of the person with one or more professional sports teams or organizations for the employment of the person by one or more professional sports teams or organizations, or to negotiate or solicit on behalf of the person for the employment of the person as a professional athlete.

(b) (1) “Athlete agent” means any person who, directly or indirectly, recruits or solicits an
 athlete to enter into any agent contract, endorsement contract, financial services contract, or professional sports services contract, or for compensation procures, offers, promises, attempts, or negotiates to obtain employment for any person with a professional sports team or organization or as a professional athlete.

(2) (A) “Athlete agent” does not include a person licensed as an attorney, dealer in securities, financial planner, insurance agent, real estate broker or sales agent, or tax consultant, or other professional person, when the professional person offers or provides the type of services customarily provided by that profession, except and solely to the extent that the professional person also recruits or solicits an athlete to enter into any agent contract, endorsement contract, or professional sports
 services contract, or for compensation procures, offers, promises, attempts, or negotiates to obtain employment for any person with a professional sports team or organization or as a professional athlete.

(B) “Athlete agent” also does not include any person acting solely on behalf of a professional sports team or organization.

(C) “Athlete agent” also does not include a talent agency as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1700.4 of the Labor Code and licensed by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1700) of Part 6 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, except as otherwise provided in this paragraph. “Athlete agent” includes a talent agency that (i) directly or indirectly recruits or solicits a student athlete to enter into an agent contract,
 endorsement contract, financial services contract, or professional sports services contract, or (ii) for compensation, procures, offers, promises, attempts, or negotiates to obtain employment for any person to perform on-field play with a professional sports team or organization.

(3) Sections 18896.6, 18897.6, and 18897.63 do not apply to an individual acting as an athlete agent solely for their spouse, child, foster child, ward, or grandchild.

(c) “Employment as a professional athlete” includes employment pursuant to an endorsement contract or a professional sports services contract.

(d) “Endorsement contract” means any contract or agreement pursuant to which a person is employed or receives remuneration for any
 value or utility that the person may have because of publicity, reputation, fame, or following obtained because of athletic ability or performance.

(e) “Financial services” means the making or execution of an investment or other financial decision, or counseling as to a financial decision.

(f) “Negotiate” includes any contact on behalf of any athlete with a professional sports team or organization or on behalf of any person with any other person who employs or potentially may employ the person as a professional athlete, regardless of whether the contact is made in person, in writing, electronically, through representatives or employees, or in any other manner. “Negotiate” also includes being present during any discussion of an endorsement contract or professional sports services
 contract with representatives of the professional sports team or organization or potential or actual employer.

(g) “Person” means any individual, company, corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, or their agents or employees.

(h) “Professional sports services contract” means any contract or agreement pursuant to which a person is employed or agrees to render services as a player on a professional sports team or organization or as a professional athlete.

(i) (1) “Student athlete” means any individual admitted to or enrolled as a student, in an elementary or secondary school, college, university, or other educational institution if the student participates, or has informed
 the institution of an intention to participate, as an athlete in a sports program where the sports program is engaged in competition with other educational institutions.

(2) “Student athlete” does not include any person who has entered into a valid agent contract, a valid endorsement contract, or a valid professional sports services contract, unless that contract is entered into in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 18897.73.

(3) “Student athlete” does not include any student of a college or university whose eligibility to participate in an intercollegiate sport has terminated, as determined by the governing body of the state or national association for the promotion and regulation of intercollegiate athletics of which the student’s college or university is a
 member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 222, Sec. 2.   (AB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Public Disclosure [18896. - 18896.8.]

18896.

To assist enforcement of this chapter, each athlete agent, prior to engaging in or carrying on the business of athlete agent, shall file the following information with the Secretary of State, in the form that the Secretary of State shall prescribe, concerning the athlete agent and each individual acting as an athlete agent within a firm, company, or partnership:

(a) The name, residence address, social security number, and driver’s license number.

(b) The street and address number of all locations where the business of the athlete agent is to be conducted.
